California statutes. Education Code
“Assistive technology device,” as provided in paragraph (1) of Section 1401 of Title 20 of the United States Code, means any item, piece of equipment, or product system, whether acquired commercially without the need for modification, modified, or customized, that is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional capabilities of an individual with exceptional needs. The term does not include a medical device that is surgically implanted, or the replacement of that device.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 653, Sec. 2.5.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

56021.

“Board” means the State Board of Education.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56021.1.

“Consent,” as provided in Section 300.9 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, means all of the following:

(a) The parent or guardian has been fully informed of all information relevant to the activity for which consent is sought, in his or her native language, or other mode of communication.

(b) The parent or guardian understands and agrees in writing to the carrying out of the activity for which his or her consent is sought; and the consent describes that activity and lists the records, if any, that will be released and to whom.

(c) The parent or guardian
 understands that the granting of consent is voluntary on the part of the parent or guardian and may be revoked at any time. If a parent or guardian revokes consent, that revocation is not retroactive to negate an action that has occurred after the consent was given and before the consent was revoked. A public agency is not required to amend the education records of a child to remove any reference to the child’s receipt of special education and services if the child’s parent or guardian submits a written revocation of consent after the initial provision of special education and related services to the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (AB 1841)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

56022.

“County office” means office of the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56023.

“Day” means a calendar day.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56024.

“Department” means the Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56025.

“District” means school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56026.

“Individuals with exceptional needs” means those persons who satisfy all the following:

(a) Identified by an individualized education program team as a child with a disability, as that phrase is defined in Section 1401(3)(A) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(b) Their impairment, as described by subdivision (a), requires instruction and services which cannot be provided with modification of the regular school program in order to ensure that the individual is provided a free appropriate public education pursuant to Section 1401(9) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(c) Come within one of the following age categories:

(1) Younger than three years of age and identified by the local educational agency as requiring intensive special education and services, as defined by the board.

(2) Between the ages of three to five years, inclusive, and identified by the local educational agency pursuant to Section 56441.11.

(3) Between the ages of five and 18 years, inclusive.

(4) Between the ages of 19 and 21 years, inclusive; enrolled in or eligible for a program under this part or other special education program prior to his or her 19th birthday; and has not yet completed his or her prescribed course of study or who has not met proficiency standards or has not graduated from high school with a regular high school diploma.

(A) Any person who becomes 22 years of age during the months of January to June, inclusive, while participating in a program under this part may continue his or her participation in the program for the remainder of the current fiscal year, including any extended school year program for individuals with exceptional needs established pursuant to Section 3043 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and Section 300.106 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) Any person otherwise eligible to participate in a program under this part shall not be allowed to begin a new fiscal year in a program if he or she becomes 22 years of age in July, August, or September of that new fiscal year. However, if a person is in a year-round school program and is completing his or her individualized education program in a term that extends into the new fiscal year, then the person may complete that term.

(C) Any person who becomes 22 years of age during the months of October, November, or December while participating in a program under this act shall be terminated from the program on December 31 of the current fiscal year, unless the person would otherwise complete his or her individualized education program at the end of the current fiscal year.

(D) No local educational agency may develop an individualized education program that extends these eligibility dates, and in no event may a pupil be required or allowed to attend school under the provisions of this part beyond these eligibility dates solely on the basis that the individual has not met his or her goals or objectives.

(d) Meet eligibility criteria set forth in regulations adopted by the board, including, but not limited to, those adopted pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 56333) of Chapter 4.

(e) Unless disabled within the meaning of subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, pupils whose educational needs are due primarily to limited English proficiency; a lack of instruction in reading or mathematics; temporary physical disabilities; social maladjustment; or environmental, cultural, or economic factors are not individuals with exceptional needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56026.1.

(a) As provided in Section 300.102(a)(3)(i) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, an individual with exceptional needs who graduates from high school with a regular high school diploma is no longer eligible for special education and related services.

(b) For purposes of this section and Section 56026, a “regular high school diploma” means a diploma conferred on a pupil who has met all local and state high school graduation requirements.

(c) As used in this section, and in accordance with Section 300.102(a)(3)(iv) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, “regular high school diploma” does not include an alternative degree that is not fully aligned with the academic standards of the State of California, such as a certificate or a General Educational Development credential (GED).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56026.2.

“Language mode” means the method of communication used by hard-of-hearing and deaf children that may include the use of sign language to send or receive messages or the use of spoken language, with or without visual signs or cues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1126, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1994.   Implementation contingent upon funding, as prescribed by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1126.)
-------------------------------------------

56026.3.

“Local educational agency” means a school district, a county office of education, a nonprofit charter school participating as a member of a special education local plan area, or a special education local plan area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 5.5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56026.5.

“Low incidence disability” means a severe disabling condition with an expected incidence rate of less than one percent of the total statewide enrollment in kindergarten through grade 12. For purposes of this definition, severe disabling conditions are hearing impairments, vision impairments, and severe orthopedic impairments, or any combination thereof. For purposes of this definition, vision impairments do not include disabilities within the function of vision specified in Section 56338.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 203, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

56027.

“Local plan” means a plan that meets the requirements of Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 56195) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 56205) and that is submitted by a single school district, two or more school districts, or one or more school districts together with one or more county offices of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56028.

(a) “Parent” means any of the following:

(1) A biological or adoptive parent of a child.

(2) A foster parent if the authority of the biological or adoptive parents to make educational decisions on the child’s behalf specifically has been limited by court order in accordance with Section 300.30(b)(1) or (2) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) A guardian generally authorized to act as the child’s parent, or authorized to make educational decisions for the child, including a responsible adult appointed for the child in accordance with Sections 361 and 726 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(4) An individual acting in the place of a biological or adoptive parent, including a grandparent, stepparent, or other relative, with whom the child lives, or an individual who is legally responsible for the child’s welfare.

(5) A surrogate parent who has been appointed pursuant to Section 7579.5 or 7579.6 of the Government Code, and in accordance with Section 300.519 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations and Section 1439(a)(5) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the biological or adoptive parent, when attempting to act as the parent under this part and when more than one party is qualified under subdivision (a) to act as a parent, shall be presumed to be the parent for purposes of this section unless the biological or adoptive parent does not have legal authority to make educational decisions for the child.

(2) If a judicial decree or order identifies a specific person or persons under paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) to act as the “parent” of a child or to make educational decisions on behalf of a child, then that person or persons shall be determined to be the “parent” for purposes of this part, Article 1 (commencing with Section 48200) of Chapter 2 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2, and Chapter 26.5 (commencing with Section 7570) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and Sections 361 and 726 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) “Parent” does not include the state or any political subdivision of government.

(d) “Parent” does not include a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency under contract with a local educational agency for the provision of special education or designated instruction and services for a child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 223, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

56028.3.

“Prone restraint” means the application of a behavioral restraint on a pupil in a facedown position for any period of time and includes the procedure known as prone containment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   (SB 483)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56028.5.

“Public agency” means a school district, county office of education, special education local plan area, a nonprofit public charter school that is not otherwise included as a local educational agency and is not a school within a local educational agency, or any other public agency under the auspices of the state or any political subdivisions of the state providing special education or related services to individuals with exceptional needs. For purposes of this part, “public agency,” means all of the public agencies listed in Section 300.33 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 5.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56029.

“Referral for assessment” means any written request for assessment to identify an individual with exceptional needs made by any of the following:

(a) A parent or guardian of the individual.

(b) A teacher or other service provider of the individual.

(c) A foster parent of the individual, consistent with the limitations contained in federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 51.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

56030.

“Responsible local agency” means the school district or county office of education designated in the local plan as the administrative entity the duties of which shall include, but are not limited to, receiving and distributing regionalized services funds, providing administrative support, and coordinating the implementation of the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

56030.5.

“Severely disabled” means individuals with exceptional needs who require intensive instruction and training in programs serving pupils with the following profound disabilities: autism, blindness, deafness, severe orthopedic impairments, serious emotional disturbances, severe intellectual disability, and those individuals who would have been eligible for enrollment in a development center for handicapped pupils under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 56800), as it read on January 1, 1980.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 347, Sec. 33.   (SB 942)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

56031.

(a) “Special education,” in accordance with Section 1401(29) of Title 20 of the United States Code, means specially designed instruction, at no cost to the parent, to meet the unique needs of individuals with exceptional needs, including instruction conducted in the classroom, in the home, in hospitals and institutions, and other settings, and instruction in physical education.

(b) In accordance with Section 300.39 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, special education includes each of the following, if the services otherwise meet the requirements of subdivision (a):

(1) Speech-language pathology services, or any other designated instruction and service or related service, pursuant to Section 56363, if the service is considered special education rather than a designated instruction and service or
 related service under state standards.

(2) Travel training.

(3) Vocational education.

(c) Transition services for individuals with exceptional needs may be special education, in accordance with Section 300.43(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if provided as specially designed instruction, or a related service, if required to assist an individual with exceptional needs to benefit from special education.

(d) Individuals with exceptional needs shall be grouped for instructional purposes according to their instructional needs.

(e) This section shall not be construed to prohibit an individualized education program from including specialized deaf and hard-of-hearing related services as the only services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 44, Sec. 2.   (AB 784)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

56032.

“Individualized education program” means a written document described in Sections 56345 and 56345.1 for an individual with exceptional needs that is developed, reviewed, and revised in a meeting in accordance with Sections 300.320 to 300.328, inclusive, of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations and this part. It also means “individualized family service plan” as described in Section 1436 of Title 20 of the United States Code if the individualized education program pertains to an individual with exceptional needs younger than three years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56033.

“Superintendent” means the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56033.5.

“Supplementary aids and services,” as provided in Section 1401(33) of Title 20 of the United States Code and in Section 300.42 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, means aids, services, and other supports that are provided in regular education classes or other education-related settings and in extracurricular and nonacademic settings, to enable individuals with exceptional needs to be educated with nondisabled children to the maximum extent appropriate in accordance with Section 1412(a)(5) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Sections 300.114 to 300.116, inclusive, of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 7.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56034.

“Nonpublic, nonsectarian school” means a private, nonsectarian school that enrolls individuals with exceptional needs pursuant to an individualized education program and is certified by the department. It does not include an organization or agency that operates as a public agency or offers public service, including, but not limited to, a state or local agency, an affiliate of a state or local agency, including a private, nonprofit corporation established or operated by a state or local agency, or a public university or college. A nonpublic, nonsectarian school also shall meet standards as prescribed by the Superintendent and board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 639, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

56035.

“Nonpublic, nonsectarian agency” means a private, nonsectarian establishment or individual that provides related services necessary for an individual with exceptional needs to benefit educationally from the pupils’ educational program pursuant to an individualized education program and that is certified by the department. It does not include an organization or agency that operates as a public agency or offers public service, including, but not limited to, a state or local agency, an affiliate of a state or local agency, including a private, nonprofit corporation established or operated by a state or local agency, a public university or college, or a public hospital. The nonpublic, nonsectarian agency shall also meet standards as prescribed by the superintendent and board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 939, Sec. 2.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Provisions [56040. - 56049.1.]

56040.

(a) Every individual with exceptional needs who is eligible to receive special education instruction and related services under this part, shall receive that instruction and those services at no cost to his or her parents or, as appropriate, to him or her. A free appropriate public education shall be available to individuals with exceptional needs in accordance with Section 1412(a)(1) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 300.101 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) An individual, aged 18 through 21 years, who, in the educational placement prior to his or her incarceration in an adult correctional facility was not identified as being an individual with exceptional needs or did not have an individualized education program under this part, is not entitled to a free appropriate public education pursuant to Section 1412(a)(1)(B)(ii) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56040.1.

In accordance with Section 1412(a)(5) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 300.114 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, each public agency shall ensure the following to address the least restrictive environment for individuals with exceptional needs:

(a) To the maximum extent appropriate, individuals with exceptional needs, including children in public or private institutions or other care facilities, are educated with children who are nondisabled.

(b) Special classes, separate schooling, or other removal of individuals with exceptional needs from the regular educational environment occurs only if the nature or severity of the disability is such that education in the regular classes with the use of supplementary aids and services cannot be achieved satisfactorily.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 8.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56040.3.

(a) Pursuant to Section 300.105 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a local educational agency shall provide, on a case-by-case basis, the use of school-purchased assistive technology devices in a child’s home or in other settings if the child’s individualized education program team determines that the child needs access to those devices in order to receive a free appropriate public education.

(b) (1) A local educational agency shall be responsible for providing an individual with exceptional needs who requires the use of an assistive technology device with continued access to that device, or to a comparable device when that individual, due to
 enrollment in another local educational agency, ceases to be enrolled in that local educational agency.

(2) The responsibility of the local educational agency under paragraph (1) shall be in force until alternative arrangements for providing the individual with exceptional needs with continuous access to the assistive technology device, or to a comparable device, can be made or until two months have elapsed from the date that the individual ceased to be enrolled in that local educational agency, whichever occurs first. 

(c) For purposes of this section, in addition to the definition of “local educational agency,” in this article, “local educational agency” also includes a charter school
 as established pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 47605) of Part 26.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 228, Sec. 2.   (AB 605)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

56040.5.

(a) State and local educational agency personnel are prohibited, pursuant to paragraph (25) of subsection (a) of Section 1412 of Title 20 of the United States Code, from requiring an individual with exceptional needs to obtain a prescription for a medication that is a substance covered by the Controlled Substances Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 801 et seq.) as a condition of attending school, receiving an assessment under subsection (a) or (c) of Section 1414 of Title 20 of the United States Code, or receiving services under this part.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not create a federal prohibition against teachers and other school personnel consulting or sharing classroom-based observations with parents or guardians regarding a pupil’s academic and functional performance, his or her behavior in the class or school, or the need for assessment for special education and related services under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 1412 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 653, Sec. 5.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

56040.6.

(a) Consistent with state and federal law, implementing inclusion and universal design for learning initiatives for pupils 0 to 22 years of age, inclusive, a local educational agency shall consider all of the following with respect to the full language access needs of pupils who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section
 56326.5 and subdivision (d) of Section 56345:

(1) The legislative findings and declarations in subdivision (b) of Section 56000.5.

(2) Section 300.114(a)(2)(ii) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, which requires each public agency to ensure that special classes, separate schooling, or other removal of pupils with disabilities from the regular educational environment occurs only if the nature or severity of the disability is such that education in regular classes with the use of supplementary aids and services cannot be achieved satisfactorily.

(3) Section 300.324(a)(2)(iv) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 56341.1, which requires an individualized family service plan and individualized education program teams in the case of a pupil who is deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind, to consider the pupil’s language and communication needs, opportunities for direct
 communications with peers and professional personnel in the pupil’s language and communication mode, academic level, and full range of needs, including opportunities for direct instruction in the pupil’s language and communication mode.

(4) Section 300.324(a)(2)(iii) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, which requires in the case of a pupil who is blind or visually impaired, to provide for instruction in braille and the use of braille unless the individualized education program team determines, after an evaluation of the pupil’s reading and writing skills, needs,
 and appropriate reading and writing media, including an evaluation of the pupil’s future needs for instruction in braille or the use of braille, that instruction in braille or the use of braille is not appropriate for the pupil.

(5) Federal guidance, as set forth in 57 Federal Register 49274 (October 30, 1992), which states that meeting the unique communication and related needs of a pupil who is deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind is a fundamental part of providing a free appropriate public education
 to the pupil.

(6) Federal guidance, as set forth in 57 Federal Register 49274 (October 30, 1992), which states that the decision as to what placement will provide a free appropriate public education for an individual pupil who is deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind, includes a determination as to the least restrictive environment in which appropriate services can be made available to the pupil, must be made only after a full and complete individualized family service plan or individualized education
 program has been developed that addresses the full range of the pupil’s needs.

(7) Subdivision (c) of Section 56341.1, which requires an individualized education program team to, if the team determines that a pupil needs a particular device or service, including an intervention, accommodation, or other program modification, in order for the pupil to receive a free appropriate public education, include a statement to that effect in the pupil’s individualized education program.

(8) The importance of obtaining stakeholder input from deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind individuals
 and experts from nonprofit organizations serving deaf and hard of hearing individuals.

(9) The importance of actively involving and respecting the input and choices of the parents or guardians of pupils, by including all of the following:

(A) Considering a pupil’s language development as specified in
 in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 56326.5 and subdivision (d) of Section 56345.

(B) Considering a pupil’s academic progress.

(C) Considering a parent’s or guardian’s knowledge and understanding of their child’s unique needs, including their insights into the child’s language and communication preferences.

(D) Facilitating meaningful participation of a parent or guardian in all team meetings and decisionmaking processes, ensuring their choices are documented and considered in the development and review of the individualized family service plan or the individualized education program.

(b) When an individualized family
 service plan or individualized education program team is determining the least restrictive environment for a deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind pupil 0 to 22 years of age, inclusive, the individualized family service plan and individualized education program team shall do both of the following:

(1) Consider the language needs, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 56326.5 and subdivision (d) of Section 56345, of the pupil, including the pupil’s language and communication needs, opportunities for direct communications with peers and professional personnel in the pupil’s language and communication mode, academic level, and full range of
 needs, including opportunities for direct instruction in the pupil’s language and communication mode consistent with, but not limited to, the requirements of Section 56341.1 and the findings and declarations in Section 56000.5.

(2) Consider reviewing placements and services available to the pupil, including those provided by a school district, a county office of education, a regional program, a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or an agency certified by the state, and the California School for the Deaf.

(c) The department shall, on or before July 1, 2025, communicate the requirements of this
 section to all local educational agencies and charter schools, as well as notify nonpublic, nonsectarian schools or agencies certified by the state, special education local plan areas, the California School for the Deaf, and the California School for the Blind regarding this section.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed as modifying or otherwise affecting the right of pupils with disabilities, including pupils who are deaf, hard of hearing, blind, visually impaired, or deaf-blind, to a free and appropriate public education pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), the development of an individualized education program, as defined in Section 56032, or the individualized education program team’s determination of placement pursuant to Sections 300.320 to 300.328,
 inclusive, of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and Section 56345, aids to ensure effective communication pursuant to Section 35.160 of Title 28 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or the continuum of program options that shall be made available as required by Sections 56000.5, 56360, and 56361.

(e) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 903, Sec. 1.   (AB 1938)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56041.

Except for those pupils meeting residency requirements for school attendance specified in subdivision (a) of Section 48204, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, if it is determined by the individualized education program team that special education services are required beyond the pupil’s 18th birthday, the district of residence responsible for providing special education and related services to pupils between the ages of 18 to 22 years, inclusive, shall be assigned, as follows:

(a) For nonconserved pupils, the last district of residence in effect prior to the pupil’s attaining the age of majority shall become and remain as the responsible local educational agency, as long as and until the parent or parents relocate to a new district of residence. At that time, the new district of residence shall become the responsible local educational agency.

(b) For conserved pupils, the district of residence of the conservator shall attach and remain the responsible local educational agency, as long as and until the conservator relocates or a new one is appointed. At that time, the new district of residence shall attach and become the responsible local educational agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1360, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

56041.5.

When an individual with exceptional needs reaches the age of 18, with the exception of an individual who has been determined to be incompetent under state law, the local educational agency shall provide any notice of procedural safeguards required by this part to both the individual and the parents of the individual. All other rights accorded to a parent under this part shall transfer to the individual with exceptional needs. The local educational agency shall notify the individual and the parent of the transfer of rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 691, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

56042.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an attorney or advocate for a parent of an individual with exceptional needs shall not recommend placement in a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency with which the attorney or advocate is employed or contracted, or otherwise has a conflict of interest or from which the attorney or advocate receives a benefit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 939, Sec. 3.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

56043.

The primary timelines affecting special education programs are as follows:

(a) A proposed assessment plan shall be developed within 15 calendar days of referral for assessment, not counting calendar days between the pupil’s regular school sessions or terms or calendar days of school vacation in excess of five schooldays, from the date of receipt of the referral, unless the parent or guardian agrees in writing to an extension, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56321.

(b) A parent or guardian shall have at least 15 calendar days from the receipt of the proposed assessment plan to arrive at a decision, pursuant to
 subdivision (c) of Section 56321.

(c) Once a child has been referred for an initial assessment to determine whether the child is an individual with exceptional needs and to determine the educational needs of the child, these determinations shall be made, and an individualized education program team meeting shall occur, within 60 days of receiving parental consent for the assessment, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56302.1, except as specified in subdivision (b) of that section, and pursuant to Section 56344.

(d) The individualized education program team shall review the pupil’s individualized education program periodically, but not less frequently than annually, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 56341.1.

(e) A parent or guardian shall be notified of the individualized education program team meeting early enough to ensure an opportunity to attend, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section
 56341.5. Consistent with Section 1414(d)(1)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title 20 of the United States Code, if determined appropriate by a pupil’s individualized education program team, in the case of an individual with exceptional needs who is starting their high school experience and not later than when the pupil is 16 years of age or younger, as appropriate, the meeting notice shall indicate that a purpose of the meeting will be the consideration of the postsecondary goals and transition services for the individual with exceptional needs, and the meeting notice described
 in this subdivision shall indicate that the individual with exceptional needs is invited to attend, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 56341.5.

(f) (1) An individualized education program required as a result of an assessment of a pupil shall be developed within a total time not to exceed 60 calendar days, not counting days between the pupil’s regular school sessions, terms, or days of school vacation in excess of five schooldays, from the date of receipt of the parent’s or guardian’s written consent for assessment, unless the parent or guardian agrees in writing to an extension, pursuant to Section 56344.

(2) A meeting to develop an initial individualized education program for the pupil shall be conducted within 30 days of a determination that the
 child needs special education and related services pursuant to Section 300.323(c)(1) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations and in accordance with Section 56344.

(g) (1) Consistent with Section 1414(d)(1)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title 20 of the United States Code, if determined appropriate by a pupil’s individualized education program team, beginning when the pupil starts their high school experience or not later than the first individualized education program to be in effect when the pupil is 16 years of age or younger, as appropriate, and updated annually thereafter, the individualized education program shall include appropriate measurable postsecondary goals and transition services needed to assist the pupil in reaching those goals, pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 56345. If the individualized education program team determines that the pupil would benefit from the postponement of the inclusion of appropriate measurable postsecondary goals and transition services until 16 years of age, rather than when the pupil begins their high school experience, the individualized education program team is encouraged to appropriately justify the basis for that postponement.

(2) The individualized education program for pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, shall include any alternative means and modes necessary for the pupil to complete the district’s prescribed course of study and to meet or exceed proficiency standards for graduation, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 56345.

(3) Beginning not later than one year before the pupil reaches 18 years of age, the individualized education program shall contain a statement that the pupil has been informed of the pupil’s rights under this part, if any, that will transfer to the pupil upon reaching 18 years of age, pursuant to Section 56041.5, subdivision (g) of Section 56345, and Section 300.520 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(h) Pursuant to Section 1414(d)(1)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 56345.1, if determined appropriate by the pupil’s individualized education program team, beginning when the pupil starts their high school experience and not later than when the pupil is 16 years of age or younger, as appropriate, and annually thereafter, a statement of needed transition services shall be included in the pupil’s individualized education
 program. If the individualized education program team determines that the pupil would benefit from the postponement of the inclusion of appropriate measurable postsecondary goals and transition services until 16 years of age, rather than when the pupil begins their high school experience, the individualized education program team is encouraged to appropriately justify the basis for that postponement.

(i) A pupil’s individualized education program shall be implemented as soon as possible following the individualized education program team meeting, pursuant to Section 300.323(c)(2) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations and in accordance with Section 56344.

(j) An individualized education program team shall meet at least annually to review a pupil’s progress, the individualized